Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 5
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS

25.5-5-500.3. Authorization to bill third party.

As a condition of doing business in the state, each provider is deemed to authorize the state department, or an independent contractor retained by the state department, to bill a third party, as defined in section 25.5-4-209 (2)(g)(II), on behalf of the provider if the third party is determined to be liable to pay for care pursuant to sections 25.5-4-209 and 25.5-4-300.4.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-167), ch. 296, p. 1379, § 9, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 10-167, see section 1 of chapter 296, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-5-501. Providers - drug reimbursement.

As to drugs for which payment is made, the state board's rules for payment must include the requirement that the generic equivalent of a brand-name drug be prescribed if the generic equivalent is a therapeutic equivalent to the brand-name drug, except when reimbursement to the state for a brand-name drug makes the brand-name drug less expensive than the cost of the generic equivalent. The state department shall grant an exception to this requirement if the patient has been stabilized on a medication and the treating physician, or a pharmacist with the concurrence of the treating physician, is of the opinion that a transition to the generic equivalent of the brand-name drug would be unacceptably disruptive. The requirements of this subsection (1) do not apply to medications for the treatment of behavioral or mental health disorders, cancer, epilepsy, or human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune deficiency syndrome.

The provisions of this subsection (1) shall apply to fee-for-service and primary care physician program recipients.

It is the general assembly's intent that requiring the use of a generic equivalent of a brand-name drug will produce savings within the state's medicaid program. The state department, therefore, is authorized to use savings in the medical services premiums appropriations to fund the administrative review process required by subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1904, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 13-1266), ch. 217, p. 992, § 63, effective May 13.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1329, § 205, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-406 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

25.5-5-502. Unused medications - reuse - rules - definition.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "medication" means prescription medication that is not a controlled substance.

A pharmacist participating in the medical assistance program may accept unused medication from a licensed facility, as defined in section 12-280-135 (1)(b), or a licensed health-care provider for the purpose of dispensing the medication to another person. A pharmacist shall reimburse the state department for the cost of medications that the state department has paid to the pharmacist if medications are returned to a pharmacist and the medications are available to be dispensed to another person. Medications shall only be available to be dispensed to another person under this section if the medications are:

Liquid and the vial is still sealed and properly stored;

Individually packaged and the packaging has not been damaged; or

In the original, unopened, sealed, and tamper-evident unit dose packaging.

Medication dispensed pursuant to this section shall bear an expiration date that is later than six months after the date the drug was donated.

Any savings realized through reimbursements received pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall fund the administration of this section.

The state board, in consultation with the state board of pharmacy, shall adopt rules for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1904, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

IP(2) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1621, § 76, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP(2) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1710, § 186, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2803, § 24, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-406.3 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-503. Prescription drug benefits - authorization - dual-eligible participation.

The state department is authorized to ensure the participation of Colorado medical assistance recipients, who are also eligible for medicare, in any federal prescription drug benefit enacted for medicare recipients.

Prescribed drugs shall not be a covered benefit under the medical assistance program for a recipient who is eligible for a prescription drug benefit program under medicare; except that, if a prescribed drug is not a covered Part D drug as defined in the "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-173, the prescribed drug may be a covered benefit if it is otherwise covered under the medical assistance program and federal financial participation is available.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1905, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1631, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-406.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For additional information on the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003", see Pub.L. 108-173.

25.5-5-504. Providers of pharmaceutical services.

Consistent with the provisions of section 25.5-4-401 (1), and consistent with subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and subject to available appropriations, no provider of pharmaceutical services who meets the conditions imposed by this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title and who complies with the terms and conditions established by the state department and contracting health maintenance organizations and prepaid health plans shall be excluded from contracting for the provision of pharmaceutical services to recipients authorized in this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title.

This provision shall not apply to a health maintenance organization or prepaid health plan that enrolls less than forty percent of all the resident medicaid recipients in any county with over one thousand medicaid recipients.

The state board shall establish specifications in rules in order to provide criteria to health maintenance organizations and prepaid health plans which ensure the accessibility and quality of service to clients and the terms and conditions for pharmaceutical contracts.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1905, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-407 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-505. Prescribed drugs - mail order - rules.

The state board shall adopt by rule a system to allow medical assistance recipients the option to receive through the mail prescribed maintenance medications used to treat chronic medical conditions.
(1) (a) (I) The state board shall adopt by rule a system to allow medical assistance recipients the option to receive through the mail prescribed maintenance medications used to treat chronic medical conditions.

The state board rules must include the definition of maintenance medications. The rules may allow a medical assistance recipient to receive through the mail up to a three-month supply, or the maximum allowed under federal law, of maintenance medications used to treat chronic medical conditions.

To the extent allowed by federal law, the state department shall require that a medical assistance recipient receiving prescription medication through the mail pay the same copayment amount as a medical assistance recipient receiving prescription medication through any other method. The state department shall encourage medical assistance recipients who choose to receive maintenance medications through the mail to use local retail pharmacies for mail delivery.

A pharmacy may provide maintenance medications through the mail to medical assistance recipients in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws if the pharmacy is enrolled as a provider with the state department and is registered with the state board of pharmacy, created and existing pursuant to section 12-280-104.

A nonresident prescription drug outlet doing business in this state shall provide a means for recipients of state medical assistance who have third-party insurance with whom the nonresident prescription drug outlet has a contractual relationship to receive their required pharmacy benefits at a cost to the recipients of no more than the legally allowed state medical assistance copayment. If a third-party insurance carrier's copayment or deductible for pharmacy benefits is larger than the legally allowed state medical assistance copayment, the prescription drug outlet may bill the state medical assistance program for the difference pursuant to state medical assistance reimbursement rules.

(1.5) The state department shall publish on its website and include in the recipient handbook the following information for recipients enrolled in fee-for-service medical assistance programs:

That a medical assistance recipient may use the pharmacy of his or her choice;

That a medical assistance recipient may use a local retail pharmacy for mail delivery of maintenance medications, if offered; and

That the copayment amount for prescription medications is the same at any pharmacy enrolled in the medical assistance program.

The state department shall seek any federal authorization necessary to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1905, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 890, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2009:

(1)(a)(I)(B) amended, (SB 09-252), ch. 271, p. 1228, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2016:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, (SB 16-027), ch. 208, p. 745, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1710, § 187, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-407.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-506. Prescribed drugs - utilization review.

The state department shall develop and implement a drug utilization review process to assure the appropriate utilization of drugs by patients receiving medical assistance in the fee-for-service and primary care physician programs. The review process shall include the monitoring of prescription information and shall address at a minimum underutilization and overutilization of benefit drugs. Periodic reports of findings and recommendations shall be forwarded to the state department.

It is the general assembly's intent that the implementation of a drug utilization review process for the fee-for-service and primary care physician programs will produce savings within the state's medicaid program. The state department, therefore, is authorized to use savings in the medical services premiums appropriations to fund the development and implementation of a drug utilization review process for these programs, as required by subsection (1) of this section. The state department may contract on a contingency basis for the development or implementation of the review process required by subsection (1) of this section.

The state department shall implement drug utilization mechanisms, including, but not limited to, prior authorization, to control costs in the medical assistance program associated with prescribed drugs. The state board shall promulgate a rule that outlines a process in which any interested party may be notified of and comment on the implementation of any prior authorization for a class of prescribed drugs before the class is prior authorized.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1906, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3)(b) repealed, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 51, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-408 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-507. Prescription drug information and technical assistance program - rules.

There is hereby created the prescription drug information and technical assistance program. The program shall provide advice on the prudent use of prescription drugs to persons who receive prescription drug benefits pursuant to this part 5. The state department shall contract with licensed pharmacists for statewide medicaid pharmacy services and pharmacy consultations for persons receiving prescription drug benefits pursuant to this part 5 regarding how each person may, with the approval of the appropriate prescribing health-care provider, avoid dangerous drug interactions, improve patient outcomes, and save the state money for the drugs prescribed. The state department shall promulgate rules to establish and administer the program and to provide incentive payments to pharmacists and physicians who participate in the program. The state department shall design a calculation for savings under the program.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1631, § 2, effective July 1.

25.5-5-508. Electronic prescriptions - study - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1073), ch. 282, p. 1286, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2010. (See L. 2009, p. 1286.)

25.5-5-509. Substance use disorder - prescription drugs - opiate antagonist.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this part 5 to the contrary, for the treatment of a substance use disorder, in promulgating rules, and subject to any necessary federal authorization, the state board shall authorize reimbursement for at least one federal food and drug administration-approved ready-to-use opioid overdose reversal drug without prior authorization.

As used in this subsection (2), unless the context otherwise requires, "opiate antagonist" has the same meaning as set forth in section 12-30-110 (7)(d).

A hospital or emergency department shall receive reimbursement under the medical assistance program for the cost of an opiate antagonist if, in accordance with section 12-30-110, a prescriber, as defined in section 12-30-110 (7)(h), dispenses an opiate antagonist upon discharge to a medical assistance recipient who is at risk of experiencing an opiate-related drug overdose event or to a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a medical assistance recipient who is at risk of experiencing an opiate-related drug overdose event.

The state department shall seek federal financial participation for the cost of reimbursement for the opiate antagonist, but shall provide reimbursement to the hospital or emergency department for the opiate antagonist using state money until federal financial participation is available.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added (HB 18-1007), ch. 225, p. 1433, § 6, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1670, § 50, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1326 stating the purpose of, and the provision directing legislative staff agencies to conduct, a post-enactment review pursuant to § 2-2-1201 scheduled in 2024, 2025, and 2027, see sections 1 and 55 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2022. To obtain a copy of the review, once completed, go to "Legislative Resources and Requirements" on the Colorado General Assembly's website.

25.5-5-510. Pharmacy reimbursement - substance use disorder - injections.

If a pharmacy has entered into a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement with one or more physicians pursuant to section 12-280-602 to administer injectable antagonist medication for medication-assisted treatment for substance use disorders, the pharmacy administering the drug shall receive an enhanced dispensing fee that aligns with the administration fee paid to a provider in a clinical setting.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1007), ch. 225, p. 1433, § 7, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1710, § 188, effective October 1.

25.5-5-511. Reimbursement for pharmacists' services - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Pharmacists are highly trained and educated doctorate-level health-care professionals specializing in the effective use of medications and their outcomes;

Pharmacists provide health care throughout the entire health-care system, practicing in community pharmacies, hospitals, provider clinic offices, and specialty areas;

With ninety percent of Americans living within five miles of a pharmacy, pharmacists are able to provide valuable public health services to communities and to provide those services in novel ways, including during nontraditional hours and without appointments;

As part of an integrated team, pharmacists have been proven to lower the overall cost of health care and improve long-term chronic disease outcomes; however, despite these recognized benefits, pharmacists are not considered reimbursable medical providers;

Further, pharmacists in integrated medical homes under the medical assistance program are not supported by the same funding mechanisms as other providers, including rate setting for federally qualified health centers or through fee-for-service billing;

Without the ability to generate revenue through direct reimbursement or new value-based models, the services pharmacists provide are not sustainable;

Colorado has recognized that there is a shortage in primary care providers for individuals enrolled in the medical assistance program; and

Pharmacists can help address this shortage by providing certain primary care services as a follow-up to physician care through collaborative practice models, including the provision of chronic disease management.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that the ability of pharmacists to generate revenue for the same services provided by other health-care providers would be equitable, would help fund staff and services in medical homes, and would alleviate barriers to access of care in community settings.

A pharmacist is eligible to receive reimbursement under the medical assistance program for medically necessary services authorized in part 6 of article 280 of title 12 that are not duplicative of other pharmacist services or programs reimbursed under the medical assistance program.

The state department shall include the services reimbursed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section in the review of provider rates required pursuant to section 25.5-4-401.5.

The state department shall request any federal authorization necessary to receive federal financial participation under the medical assistance program.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1275), ch. 470, p. 3377, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-5-512. Pharmacy benefit - mental health and substance use disorders - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

It is estimated that over one million Coloradans experience a mental health or substance use disorder each year, yet less than half of the adult population in this state receives the care it needs;

It is well documented that access to appropriate treatments, including medication, can lead to better outcomes for individuals dealing with these diagnoses;

For this reason, policies that restrict access to medications lead to poorer outcomes and increased health-care costs;

Pharmacists also play an important role in improving access to treatments for serious mental illness and substance use disorders; and

The use of extended-release injectable medications for serious mental illness and substance use disorders has research-proven clinical benefits compared to oral medications, including medication adherence and significant delay and reduction in relapse, which decreases criminal recidivism and emergency room visits for patients from vulnerable populations, particularly those experiencing homelessness.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that access to these treatments through a pharmacy benefit under the medical assistance program will improve access to mental health providers by allowing pharmacists to dispense, administer, and be reimbursed for these important and effective medications.

A pharmacist or pharmacy that dispenses or administers extended-release injectable medications for the treatment of mental health or substance use disorders may seek reimbursement for those medications under the medical assistance program either as a pharmacy benefit or as a medical benefit.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1275), ch. 470, p. 3377, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-5-513. Pharmacy benefits - prescription drugs - rebates - analysis.

Beginning in 2023, the state department shall, in collaboration with the administrator of the all-payer health claims database described in section 25.5-1-204, conduct an annual analysis of the prescription drug rebates received in the previous calendar year, by health insurance carrier and prescription drug tier. The analysis, using data from the all-payer health claims database and other sources, must be completed on or before May 1 of each year.

The state department shall make the analysis conducted in subsection (1) of this section available to the public on an annual basis.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1370), ch. 184, p. 1237, § 7, effective August 10.